Washington statutes.
RCW 15.140.100

Cross-pollination—Hemp plants and cannabis plants.

(1) There is no distance requirement, limitation, or buffer zone between any licensed hemp producer or hemp processing facility licensed or authorized under this chapter and any cannabis producer or cannabis processor licensed under chapter 69.50 RCW. No rule may establish such a distance requirement, limitation, or buffer zone without the evaluation of sufficient data showing impacts to either crop as a result of cross-pollination.

(2) Notwithstanding subsection (1) of this section, in an effort to prevent cross-pollination between hemp plants produced under this chapter and cannabis plants produced under chapter 69.50 RCW, the department, in consultation with the liquor and cannabis board, must review the state's policy regarding cross-pollination and pollen capture to ensure an appropriate policy is in place, and must modify policies or establish new policies as appropriate. Under any such policy, when a documented conflict involving cross-pollination exists between two farms or production facilities growing or producing hemp or cannabis, the farm or production facility operating first in time shall have the right to continue operating and the farm or production facility operating second in time must cease growing or producing hemp or cannabis, as applicable.

[ 2022 c 16 s 20; 2019 c 158 s 10.]

NOTES:

Intent—Finding—2022 c 16: See note following RCW 69.50.101.